Hawaii statutes.
[§200-62] Trespass to vessel; penalty. Whoever,
without right, boards or remains in or upon any vessel of another within the
waters of the State shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next